Hawaii statutes.
§603-2 Title. There shall be
established in each of the judicial circuits of the State a court with the
powers and under the conditions hereinafter set forth, which shall be styled
the circuit court of such circuit, as, for instance, the circuit court of the
third circuit. [L 1892, c 57, pt of §30; RL 1925, §2235; RL 1935, §3631; RL
1945, §9632; RL 1955, §215-2; HRS §603-2]

Rules of Court

Acts or proceedings outside the circuit, see HRCP rules
77(b), 82.

Case Notes

Prior to statehood, circuit court not a court of the United
States within meaning of Norris-La Guardia Act. 37 H. 404 (1946).

As to whether extra-territorial jurisdiction may be
exercised, see 46 H. 197, 377 P.2d 609 (1962).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next